Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1110.03
Accounting Administrator; prepare schedule of fees.

The Accounting Administrator at the direction of the Director of Administrative Services shall prepare a schedule of fees to assess agencies for accounting services performed by the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services. The fees shall be adequate to cover actual and necessary expenses associated with providing the services.

Laws 1995, LB 325, § 1.